Maine, session 132, LD666.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Transfer of settlement funds. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, the State Controller shall transfer $500,000 from the Administration -
Attorney General, Other Special Revenue Funds account within the Department of the
Attorney General from funds received from settlement agreements to the unappropriated
surplus of the General Fund no later than June 30, 2027.
Sec. 2. Reallocation of existing funds. Any existing funds allocated to the
Department of Corrections, Office of Victim Services for the purpose of funding partial
reimbursement of certified domestic violence intervention program indigent participant
fees must be reallocated to similarly provide ongoing funding for certified domestic
violence intervention programs.
Sec. 3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
CORRECTIONS, DEPARTMENT OF
Office of Victim Services 0046
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for certified domestic violence intervention
programs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $500,000
Page 1 - 132LR1026(09)